Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2044.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6115.1. Report of theft or loss of firearm.(a) Duty to report.--An owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers the loss or theft of a firearm shall, within 72 hours of the discovery of the loss or theft, report the facts and circumstances of the loss or theft to the municipal police of the jurisdiction in which the loss or theft is believed to have occurred or the Pennsylvania State Police. The person making the report shall provide all known information about the firearm, including the following:1234567891011121314151617 (1) Name and address of the owner.(2) All known facts and circumstances pertaining to the loss or theft.(3) Name of the manufacturer and importer.(4) Model.(5) Type of action.(6) Caliber or gauge.(7) Serial number.(8) Any other information deemed necessary by the officer or police department receiving the report.(b) Sharing of information.-- Information provided to a law enforcement agency under subsection (a) shall be entered into the Commonwealth Law Enforcement Assistance Network and National Crime Information Center database by the receiving law enforcement agency within 24 hours of receiving the report of a lost or stolen firearm.(c) Return of firearm.--A lost or stolen firearm recovered by the Pennsylvania State Police or a local law enforcement agency shall be returned to the lawful owner, subject to the provisions of section 6111.1(b)(4) (relating to Pennsylvania State Police).(d) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits: (1) A summary offense for the first offense, punishable by a fine of not more than $500.(2) A misdemeanor of the second degree for a second offense.(3) A misdemeanor of the first degree for a third or subsequent offense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2044PN2641 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829